Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2025
Inheritance tax; estate not subject to tax; determination.

If it shall be made to appear to the county judge in either probate proceedings or an independent proceeding for the determination of such tax that an estate is not subject to such inheritance tax, the county judge may so determine, and such finding and order shall be made a part of the final decree in said estate or proceeding.

Laws 1915, c. 113, § 1, p. 262;

C.S.1922, § 6163;

C.S.1929, § 77-2211;

R.S.1943, § 77-2025;

Laws 1949, c. 242, § 3, p. 657.